District of Columbia statutes.
12-102

Substitution of parties.

The substitution of parties in civil actions in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia and the Superior Court of the District of Columbia is governed by the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 509, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 551, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 141(1)
1973 Ed., § 12-102.
1981 Ed., § 12-102.